Hawaii statutes.
§468E-11 Waiver of examination or parts
thereof. The board shall waive the requirements of section 468E-5 for
applicants for licensure who, on the effective date of this chapter, are
actually engaged in this State in the practice of speech pathology or audiology,
upon proof of bona fide practice presented to the board in a manner prescribed
by rules adopted by the board. [L 1974, c 48, pt of §1; am L 1988, c 320, §8]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next